Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.050

State board for community and technical colleges.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1486-S.SL) ***

There is hereby created the "state board for community and technical colleges", to consist of nine members who represent the geographic diversity of the state, and who shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. At least two members shall reside east of the Cascade mountains. In making these appointments, the governor shall attempt to provide geographic balance and give consideration to representing labor, business, women, and racial and ethnic minorities, among the membership of the board. At least one member of the board shall be from business and at least one member of the board shall be from labor. The current members of the state board for community college education on September 1, 1991, shall serve on the state board for community and technical colleges until their terms expire. Successors to these members shall be appointed according to the terms of this section. A ninth member shall be appointed by September 1, 1991, for a complete term.

The successors of the members initially appointed shall be appointed for terms of four years except that a person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of any term shall be appointed only for the remainder of such term. Each member shall serve until the appointment and qualification of his or her successor. All members shall be citizens and bona fide residents of the state.

Members of the college board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for each day actually spent in attending to the duties as a member of the college board.

The members of the college board may be removed by the governor for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office, in the manner provided by RCW 28B.10.500.

[1991 c 238 s 30; 1988 c 76 s 1; 1984 c 287 s 64; 1982 1st ex.s. c 30 s 9; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 74; 1973 c 62 s 13; 1969 ex.s. c 261 s 19; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.050. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 5.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.

Savings—Severability—1973 c 62: See notes following RCW 28B.10.510.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 261: See note following RCW 28B.50.020.

Appointment of director of state system of community and technical colleges, by: RCW 28B.50.060.

Employees of, appointment and employment of: RCW 28B.50.060.

Occupational forecast—Agency consultation: RCW 50.38.030.

Powers and duties: RCW 28B.50.090.